Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1109
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 31;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 47;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 259.